Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
PROSTITUTION, PROMOTING PROSTITUTION, AND SEX TRAFFICKING

Note

Part heading amended by L 2016, c 206, §11.

Cross References

Liability for coercion into prostitution, see chapter 663J.

§712-1200 Prostitution. (1) A person
commits the offense of prostitution if the person:

(a) Engages in, or agrees or offers to engage in,
sexual conduct with another person in return for a fee; or

(b) Pays, agrees to pay, or offers to pay a fee to
another to engage in sexual conduct.

(2) As used in this section:

"Minor" means a person who is less
than eighteen years of age.

"Sexual conduct" means "sexual
penetration", "deviate sexual intercourse", or "sexual
contact", as those terms are defined in section 707-700, or
"sadomasochistic abuse" as defined in section 707-752.

(3) Prostitution is a petty misdemeanor;
provided that:

(a) If the person who commits the offense under
subsection (1)(a) is a minor, prostitution is a violation; and

(b) If the person who commits the offense under
subsection (1)(b) does so in reckless disregard of the fact that the other
person is a victim of sex trafficking, prostitution is a class C felony.

(4) A person convicted of committing the
offense of prostitution as a petty misdemeanor shall be sentenced as follows:

(a) For the first offense, when the court has not
deferred further proceedings pursuant to chapter 853, a fine of not less than
$500 but not more than $1,000 and the person may be sentenced to a term of
imprisonment of not more than thirty days or probation; provided that in the
event the convicted person defaults in payment of the fine, and the default was
not contumacious, the court may sentence the person to perform services for the
community as authorized by section 706-605(1).

(b) For any subsequent offense, a fine of not less
than $500 but not more than $1,000 and a term of imprisonment of thirty days or
probation, without possibility of deferral of further proceedings pursuant to
chapter 853 and without possibility of suspension of sentence.

(c) For the purpose of this subsection, if the court
has deferred further proceedings pursuant to chapter 853, and notwithstanding
any provision of chapter 853 to the contrary, the defendant shall not be
eligible to apply for expungement pursuant to section 831-3.2 until four years
following discharge. A plea previously entered by a defendant under section
853-1 for a violation of this section shall be considered a prior offense.
When the court has ordered a sentence of probation, the court may impose as a
condition of probation that the defendant complete a course of prostitution
intervention classes; provided that the court may only impose the condition for
one term of probation.

(5) This section shall not apply to any member
of a police department, a sheriff, or a law enforcement officer acting in the
course and scope of duties, unless engaged in sexual penetration or
sadomasochistic abuse.

(6) A minor may be taken into custody by any
police officer without order of the judge when there are reasonable grounds to
believe that the minor has violated [subsection] (1)(a). The
minor shall be released, referred, or transported pursuant to section
571-31(b). The minor shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the family court
pursuant to section 571-11(1), including for the purposes of custody,
detention, diversion, and access to services and resources. [L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; am L 1981, c 110, §1; am L 1986, c 314, §§73, 74; am L 1990, c 204, §1; am
L 1993, c 130, §1; am L 1998, c 177, §2; am L 2011, c 145, §7; am L 2012, c
216, §3; am L 2013, c 247, §3; am L 2014, c 114, §3; am L 2016, c 206, §12 and
c 231, §51; am L 2016, c 206, §12 and c 231, §51]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) Subsection (2), definitions rearranged; and

(2) Subsection (6), in the first sentence,
"paragraph" changed to "subsection" and in the second
sentence, "subsection" changed to "section".

COMMENTARY ON §712-1200

History has proven that prostitution is not going to be
abolished either by penal legislation nor the imposition of criminal sanctions
through the vigorous enforcement of such legislation. Yet the trend of modern
thought on prostitution in this country is that "public policy"
demands that the criminal law go on record against prostitution.[1] Defining
this "public policy" is a difficult task. Perhaps it more correctly
ought to be considered and termed "public demand"--a widespread
community attitude which the penal law must take into account regardless of the
questionable rationales upon which it is based.

A number of reasons have been advanced for the suppression of
prostitution, the most often repeated of which are: "the prevention of
disease, the protection of innocent girls from exploitation, and the danger
that more sinister activities may be financed by the gains from prostitution."[2]
These reasons are not convincing. Venereal disease is not prevented by laws
attempting to suppress prostitution. If exploitation were a significant
factor, the offense could be dealt with solely in terms of coercion. Legalizing
prostitution would decrease the prostitute's dependence upon and connection
with the criminal underworld and might decrease the danger that "organized
crime" might be financed in part by criminally controlled prostitution.

Our study of public attitude in this area revealed the
widespread belief among those interviewed that prostitution should be
suppressed entirely or that it should be so restricted as not to offend those
members of society who do not wish to consort with prostitutes or to be affronted
by them. Making prostitution a criminal offense is one method of controlling
the scope of prostitution and thereby protecting those segments of society
which are offended by its open existence. This "abolitionist"
approach is not without its vociferous detractors. There are those that
contend that the only honest and workable approach to the problem is to
legalize prostitution and confine it to certain localities within a given
community. While such a proposal may exhibit foresight and practicality, the
fact remains that a large segment of society is not presently willing to accept
such a liberal approach. Recognizing this fact and the need for public order,
the Code makes prostitution and its associate enterprises criminal offenses.

This section makes the offense of prostitution contingent on
the commission by a male or female of at least one of three acts: (1) engaging
in sexual conduct with another person for a fee, or (2) agreeing to engage in
sexual conduct with another person for a fee, or (3) an offer to engage in
sexual conduct with another person for a fee. Under this section the sex of
the parties or prospective parties is immaterial. It is no defense under this
section that: (a) both parties were of the same sex, or (b) the party who
accepted, agreed to accept, or solicited the fee was a male and the party who
tendered or agreed or offered to tender the fee was a female. To emphasize the
immateriality of the sex of the parties, the phrase "he or she" is
used for the actor in subsection (1), albeit under chapter 701 "he"
includes any natural person. The word "person" is also used in order
to denote either the masculine or feminine gender as the particular case
demands.

Subsection (2) defines "sexual conduct." As used
in subsection (1) it is given a wide scope, meaning "sexual intercourse,"
"deviate sexual intercourse," or "sexual contact," as those
terms are defined in §707-700. Subsection (3) provides that the offense is a
petty misdemeanor.

The Code's provision on prostitution is similar to previous
Hawaii law insofar as it applies to both male and female prostitution.[3]
However, unlike prior law, the Code does not cover indiscriminate sexual
intercourse without hire.[4] Instead of the vague word "lewdness,"[5]
the Code gains some specificity by employing statutorily defined phrases. In
the area of penalty, previous law imposed a fine of not more than $1,000 or
imprisonment of not more than one year, or both. The Code lowers these maxima
to $500 and 30 days, respectively, by making the offense a petty misdemeanor.
This has been done on the recommendation of some judges and with the
concurrence of the Honolulu Police Department. Since the sentences presently
imposed do not, in fact, generally exceed those authorized for a petty
misdemeanor, the Code is in accord with present practice.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §712-1200

Act 110, Session Laws 1981, added subsection (4) to specify
the sentencing alternatives upon conviction of a defendant. The legislature
felt that some form of mandatory sentence was necessary to curb prostitution
and the attendant crimes of violence and crimes against property. Senate
Conference Committee Report No. 15, House Conference Committee Report No. 25.

Act 204, Session Laws 1990, amended this section to clarify
that the customer of a prostitute would also be committing the crime of
prostitution. The legislature felt that buyers and sellers of illegal business
transactions should be targets for prosecution. House Standing Committee
Report No. 1205-90.

Act 130, Session Laws 1993, amended this section to permit
deferred pleas under chapter 853 in first-offense prostitution cases and to
prohibit expungement pursuant to §831-3.2 until four years following
discharge. The Act also provided that a plea previously entered by a defendant
under §853-1 for prostitution is considered a prior offense. Conference
Committee Report No. 62.

Act 177, Session Laws 1998, amended this section to provide
that any offense for which a person is convicted of prostitution is
probationable, and that the court may impose prostitution intervention classes
for only one term of probation. The legislature found that prostitution was a
multi-faceted problem which required efforts to encourage persons involved in
the sex industry to seek alternative lifestyles and employment options. The
legislature further found that persons involved in prostitution were often not
capable of exploring those options, and thus, those persons needed assistance
in finding educational and employment opportunities that would support their
desire to leave prostitution. Conference Committee Report No. 155.

Act 145, Session Laws 2011, amended this section by extending
the offense of prostitution to include those who pay, agree to pay, or offer to
pay a fee to another person to engage in sexual conduct. Conference Committee
Report No. 76.

Act 216, Session Laws 2012, amended the language in
subsection (4) that established a mandatory fine of $1,000 for the commission
of the first and any subsequent offense of prostitution to establish instead a
minimum fine of $500 for the commission of the first and any subsequent offense
of prostitution. Conference Committee Report No. 109-12.

Act 247, Session Laws 2013, amended this section to clarify
the minimum and maximum fine for a person convicted of committing the offense
of prostitution. Conference Committee Report No. 64.

Act 114, Session Laws 2014, amended subsection (2) by adding
sadomasochistic abuse as an element of the offense of prostitution. Act 114
also amended subsection (5) by clarifying that the law enforcement exemption
from the offense of prostitution excludes acts of sadomasochistic abuse and
sexual penetration. The legislature believed that it was unnecessary for a law
enforcement officer to engage in sexual intercourse in order to make an arrest
for prostitution because it is the financial transaction that makes the act
illegal under the offense of prostitution. Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 3249, Conference Committee Report No. 41-14.

Act 206, Session Laws 2016, amended this section, among
others, to establish a victim and survivor-centered approach to comprehensive
anti-sex trafficking laws. Specifically, Act 206 amended this section by: (1)
establishing a class C felony for the act of paying for sex in reckless
disregard of the fact that the other person is a victim of sex trafficking; and
(2) specifying that when a minor under the age of eighteen commits the act of
engaging in or offering to engage in sexual conduct with another person for a
fee, it is not a criminal offense, but rather a violation that subjects the
minor to the jurisdiction of the family court. The legislature found that the
existing laws relating to prostitution and promoting prostitution may not have
been suitable to address certain circumstances in which coercion or other
inability to consent is present. Act 206 allowed Hawaii to join other states
that had adopted comprehensive anti-sex trafficking legislation. Conference
Committee Report No. 147-16, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3450.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsection (1) to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Law Journals and Reviews

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai‘i's
Constitution. 14 UH L. Rev. 311 (1992).

Criminal Procedure Rights Under the Hawaii Constitution Since
1992. 18 UH L. Rev. 683 (1996).

Prostitution: Protected in Paradise? 30 UH L. Rev. 193
(2007).

Hawai‘i's Right to Privacy. 33 UH L. Rev. 669 (2011).

Case Notes

Evidence did not sufficiently prove whether money was given
as a gift or as a fee. 56 H. 409, 538 P.2d 1206 (1975).

Subsection (4) eliminates power of court to grant deferred
acceptance of guilty pleas. 66 H. 101, 657 P.2d 1026 (1983).

Applicable to sex for fee in a private apartment. 66 H. 616,
671 P.2d 1351 (1983).

Prohibition is gender-neutral; even if not, section did not
deny equal protection. 67 H. 608, 699 P.2d 983 (1985).

Deferred acceptance of no-contest plea or deferred acceptance
of guilty plea cannot be accepted under this section. 74 H. 75, 837 P.2d 776
(1992).

Because maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a
prostitution offense is thirty days, prostitution is presumptively a petty
offense to which right to a trial by jury does not attach; defendant did not
have a right to jury trial on prostitution charges. 77 H. 162, 883 P.2d 83
(1994).

District court imposed illegal sentences, where defendant
pleaded guilty to six offenses of prostitution, pleading guilty to each offense
in reverse chronological order, and defendant was sentenced, in reverse
chronological order, to fines of $500 for each offense. 77 H. 394, 885 P.2d
1135 (1994).

Under the plain meaning of §707-700 and this section,
touching the sexual or other intimate parts of another person, for a fee,
constitutes prostitution, even if the touching occurs through clothing. 88 H.
19, 960 P.2d 1227 (1998).

Subsection (4) does not require that a "subsequent"
offense occur on a separate day. 90 H. 262, 978 P.2d 700 (1999).

As the exception in subsection (5) would negative the
prostitution offense defendant was charged with, it constituted a defense; in
order to claim the benefit of this defense, evidence that defendant fell within
the exception must have been adduced; where defendant did not adduce any such
evidence at trial, the prosecution was not required to disprove the defense
until there was evidence that the defendant fell within subsection (5). 114 H.
1, 155 P.3d 1102 (2007).

In prostitution case, application of this section (2006) to
defendant was not unconstitutional. 114 H. 1, 155 P.3d 1102 (2007).

A "fee" is not explicitly limited to monetary
compensation, but includes payment in the form other than money and, therefore,
under this section, is money or a "material gain" for sexual conduct;
under the facts of the case, the forty-dollar drinks constituted a fee under
subsection (1). 123 H. 251, 231 P.3d 968 (2010).

Where the record did not support the prosecution's conclusion
that defendant had "an implicit understanding" that officer's
purchase of the forty-dollar drinks was for sexual contact, given the totality
of circumstances, the prosecution failed to prove beyond a reasonable doubt
that defendant "engaged in sexual conduct for a fee". 123 H. 251,
231 P.3d 968 (2010).

"Convicted" in subsection (4) is used in
pre-sentence context, and means ascertainment of guilt. 9 H. App. 165, 827
P.2d 1156 (1992).

Whether the men responded to defendant's offers and the
substance of their responses were irrelevant under prostitution statute;
defendant merely had to offer to engage in sex in exchange for a fee. There
was substantial evidence for trial judge to find that defendant offered to
engage in sexual conduct in exchange for money. 79 H. 123 (App.), 899 P.2d 406
(1995).

As court had no discretion under subsection (4)(b) in
imposing stiffer sentence on defendant once it was established that defendant
was a subsequent prostitution offender, defendant was not required to raise a
good-faith challenge to the prior conviction in order to trigger the State's
burden to prove that defendant was represented by counsel or waived such
representation at the time of defendant's prior conviction. 89 H. 492 (App.),
974 P.2d 1082 (1998).

Where officer testified to a prior arrest of defendant,
defendant admitted to prior arrest by officer, trial court was able to evaluate
and match physical identifying information in criminal history abstract with
defendant, abstract set out the prior prostitution conviction of a defendant
with the same name, and defendant had rather unusual name for person in Hawaii,
evidence was sufficient to establish beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant had
a prior prostitution conviction for purposes of subsection (4). 89 H. 492
(App.), 974 P.2d 1082 (1998).

As the First Amendment does not protect speech which is part
of a course of criminal conduct, and defendant's words were an integral part of
defendant's conduct in violating a valid statute prohibiting offers or
agreements to engage in sex for a fee (this section), defendant's prosecution
did not violate the First Amendment. 107 H. 360 (App.), 113 P.3d 811 (2005).

This section does not proscribe constitutionally protected
conduct and was not overbroad as applied to defendant's actual conduct; the
language of this section also was sufficiently clear that defendant was not
required to guess at its meaning, this section gave defendant fair warning that
defendant was prohibited from offering or agreeing to engage in sex for a fee.
107 H. 360 (App.), 113 P.3d 811 (2005).

Trial court's factual findings pertaining to defendant's
offer and agreement to engage in sex for $200 were not clearly erroneous and
there was sufficient evidence to support defendant's prostitution conviction
under this section. 107 H. 360 (App.), 113 P.3d 811 (2005).

__________

§711-1200 Commentary:

1. Prop. Del. Cr. Code, comments at 427.

2. Id. See also, M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 9, comments at
171 (1959).

3. See H.R.S. §768-51.

4. See id. §768-52(1).

5. See id. §768-52(2).